Massachusetts, session 194th, H4795.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 1.9 of the charter for the town of Groton, which is on file in the
office of the archivist of the commonwealth, as provided in section 12 of chapter 43B of the
General Laws, is hereby amended by inserting after the definition of “Multiple-member body”
the following definition:-
“Publish”, posting a document on the Town website and in a prominent and accessible
location, with hard copies made available upon request.
SECTION 2. Section 2.11 of said charter is hereby amended by striking out the first 2
paragraphs and inserting in place thereof the following 2 paragraphs:-
There shall be published for every town meeting a copy of the warrant, together with its
articles, and a report to the voters that shall contain the explanation and relevant data submitted
by the proponents of each article; provided, however, that the town manager may direct that
of 8

voluminous supporting material necessary for consideration of particular articles be made
reasonably available for inspection at public locations before the town meeting in lieu of
inclusion in the written report to the voters. The written report for each town meeting shall
include: (i) the written report of the planning board setting forth its findings and
recommendations as to all zoning articles; (ii) the written report of the finance committee, which
shall set forth its findings, conclusions and recommendations and its reasons therefor regarding
all of the monetary articles in the warrant; and (iii) with respect to each warrant article, in
addition to the reports of the planning board and the finance committee, the written report of a
proponent or sponsor of a warrant article and of a multiple-member body or town agency that is
required to review, recommend or sponsor the warrant article by law, appointment or otherwise.
The report for the town meeting shall also include, as an appendix, the capital
improvement plan defined in section 6.6 setting forth the proposed capital outlay program for the
ensuing fiscal year for the information and guidance of town meeting. The select board shall
have the opportunity to include in the report its conclusions and recommendations, including its
reasons therefore, regarding articles in the warrant that relate to its general superintendence over
the administration of town affairs.
SECTION 3. Paragraph 3.2.2 of section 3.2 of said charter is hereby amended by striking
out clause (v) and inserting in place thereof the following clause:-
(v) One Member of the Select Board and the Town Manager shall sign all payroll and
expense warrants.
SECTION 4. Said section 3.2 of said charter is hereby further amended by striking out
paragraph 3.2.4 and inserting in place thereof the following paragraph:-
of 8

3.2.4 Appointing Authority - The select board shall appoint the town manager, town
counsel, a zoning board of appeals, board of registrars, conservation commission, council on
aging, housing partnership, local cultural council and other committees as required by law, by-
law or town meeting vote.
SECTION 5. Paragraph 3.3.1 of section 3.3 of said charter is hereby amended by
inserting before the words “The Groton-Dunstable” the following words:- Composition, Term of
Office -.
SECTION 6. Paragraph 3.3.2 of said section 3.3 of said charter is hereby amended by
inserting before the words “The Groton-Dunstable” the following words:- Powers and Duties -.
SECTION 7. Section 3.10 of said charter is hereby amended by inserting before the
words “Powers and Duties” the following words:- 3.10.1.
SECTION 8. Said charter is hereby further amended by striking out section 4.2 and
inserting in place thereof the following section:-
Section 4.2: Powers and Duties
The town manager shall be the chief administrator of the town and shall be responsible to
the select board for the proper administration of all town affairs placed in the town manager’s
charge by this charter. The powers and duties of the town manager shall include, but not be
limited to:
(i) managing, supervising, and being responsible for the efficient and coordinated
administration of all town functions as may be authorized by this Charter, by-law, town meeting
of 8

vote or the select board, including all appointed officials, employees, department heads and their
respective departments;
(ii) unless otherwise required by law, this charter or by-law, managing and
coordinating the administrative activities of all town agencies; provided, however, that elected
officers or their representatives shall be required to meet with the town manager at reasonable
times to effect coordination and cooperation among all town agencies;
(iii) appointing and removing a police chief, fire chief and town clerk pursuant to the
policy established by the select board; provided, however, that the police chief shall serve under
section 97A of chapter 41 of the General Laws and the fire chief shall serve under section 42 of
chapter 48 of the General Laws; provided, however, that an appointment made by the town
manager shall be confirmed by the select board not more than 15 days after the date on which the
town manager files notice of the action with the select board; and provided further, that failure
by the select board to confirm an appointment in that 15-day period shall constitute rejection of
the appointment.
(iv) appointing and removing department heads, officers and subordinates and
employees and other appointed members of town government for whom no other method of
appointment or removal is provided in this charter or by-law; provided, however, that an
appointment made by the town manager shall be confirmed by the select board not more than 15
days after the date on which the town manager files notice of the action with the select board;
and provided further, that failure by the select board to confirm an appointment in that 15-day
period shall constitute rejection of the appointment;
of 8

(v) acting as a negotiator for all collective bargaining agreements to which the select
board is a party, subject to ratification by the select board;
(vi) conducting or reviewing annual performance evaluations of all employees
subject to the town manager’s or the select board’s appointment and consulting with elected and
appointed boards to contribute to the preparation of the evaluations of department heads
associated with the boards;
(vii) fixing the compensation of all employees appointed by the town manager within
the limits established by the overall approved budget, the personnel by-laws, the town’s wage
and classification schedule and collective bargaining or other agreements;
(viii) attending all regular and special meetings of the select board unless excused
at the town manager’s request and having a voice, but not a vote, in all discussions;
(ix) attending all sessions of the town meeting and answering all questions
directed to the town manager that are related to the office of the town manager or concerning
which the town manager possesses the relevant information;
(x) assuring that all laws, this charter, by-laws, town meeting votes and directives
of the select board that require enforcement by the town manager or employees subject to the
town manager’s direction and supervision are faithfully carried out;
(xi) preparing and submitting annual operating budgets and capital improvement
programs pursuant to article 6;
(xii) coordinating the preparation of the town’s annual report;
of 8

(xiii) overseeing the preservation, management and administration of all town
records so as to facilitate access to them; and
(xiv) performing such duties as necessary or as may be assigned by this charter, by-
law, town meeting vote or the select board.
SECTION 9. Paragraph 5.3.1 of section 5.3 of said charter is hereby amended by striking
100 out the word “assistant”.
101 SECTION 10. Said paragraph 5.3.1 of said section 5.3 of said charter is hereby further
102 amended by striking out the word “clause” and inserting in place thereof the following word:-
103 “subsection”.
104 SECTION 11. Paragraph 5.3.5 of said section 5.3 of said charter is hereby amended by
105 striking out the word “clause” and inserting in place thereof the following word:- “subsection”.
106 SECTION 12. Paragraph 5.3.6 of said section 5.3 of said charter is hereby amended by
107 striking out the word “clause” and inserting in place thereof the following word:- “subsection”.
108 SECTION 13. Paragraph 5.3.7 of said section 5.3 of said charter is hereby amended by
109 striking out the word “assistant”, both times it appears.
110 SECTION 14. Paragraph 5.4.1 of section 5.4 of said charter is hereby amended by
111 striking out the word “clause” and inserting in place thereof the following word:- “subsection”.
112 SECTION 15. Said charter is hereby further amended by striking out section 5.6.
of 8

113 SECTION 16. Paragraph 6.4.1 of section 6.4 of said charter is hereby amended by
114 striking out the word “October 31” and inserting in place thereof the following words:-
115 November 30.
116 SECTION 17. Section 6.5 of said charter is hereby amended by striking out paragraph
117 6.5.1 and inserting in place thereof the following paragraph:-
118 6.5.1 The finance committee shall, upon receipt of the proposed budget from the town
119 manager, consider in public meetings detailed expenditures for each town department and
120 agency and may confer with representatives of each town agency in connection with the
121 committee’s review and consideration. The finance committee may require the town manager or
122 any town agency to furnish the committee with such additional information as the committee
123 may deem necessary to assist the committee in its review and consideration of the proposed
124 budget. Not less than 14 days before the opening of the spring town meeting, the finance
125 committee shall file with the town clerk a report containing the committee’s proposed budget and
126 comments or recommendations regarding differences between the committee’s proposed budget
127 and the proposed budget submitted by the town manager. Not less than 14 days before the
128 opening of the spring town meeting the report shall be made available to voters of the town by
129 publication on the town’s website and by leaving copies of the report in not less than 2 public
130 places in the town. Copies of the report shall be made available to voters at the opening of the
131 spring town meeting. The failure to file the report with the town clerk in a timely manner or to
132 publicize the report by posting on the town’s website or in 2 public places in the town shall not
133 prohibit the town meeting from voting on the budget and shall not affect the validity of any vote
134 taken on the budget at town meeting.
of 8

135 SECTION 18. Section 6.6 of said charter is hereby amended by striking out the words
136 “December 31” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- January 31.
of 8